Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-613
Trust fund for perpetual care.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association to sell, transfer, or assign any niche or crypt in a columbarium or mausoleum without establishing a trust fund for the perpetual care and maintenance of such columbarium or mausoleum as provided by sections 12-603 and 12-606 to 12-618.

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 8, p. 148;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 124.